Alaska statutes. Title 29. Municipal Government.
Article 6. Miscellaneous Provisions.

Sec. 29.47.390.
Other municipal financing.

A municipality may authorize by ordinance or resolution the issuance of negotiable or nonnegotiable revenue bonds to finance any project that serves a public purpose, and the bonds shall be secured and payable from any source except revenues, including tax revenue, of the municipality.

Bonds issued under this section are not a debt or liability of the municipality and do not create or constitute an indebtedness, liability, or obligation of the municipality, nor do they constitute a pledge of faith, credit, or taxing power of the municipality. Each bond must contain on its face a statement that the municipality is not obligated to pay the principal or the interest on the bonds except from those sources indicated, and that neither the faith and credit nor the taxing power of the municipality is pledged to the payment of principal or interest on the bond.

A municipality may

loan the proceeds of the bonds issued under this section;

pledge, mortgage or assign money, leases, agreements, property, or other assets of the project being financed;

enter into covenants and agreements concerning bonds issued under this section that the municipality determines to be desirable;

provide for any matter that affects the security of the bonds.

In this section,

“bonds” means bonds, notes, or other evidence of indebtedness;

“project” includes commercial, manufacturing, agricultural, industrial, residential housing, recreation, tourism, and medical projects and programs.

History.

(§ 14 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 29.47.400.
Sale.

Bonds and notes issued under this chapter may be sold at either public or private sale by the municipality in the manner and at the price it determines.

History.

(§ 14 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 29.47.410.
Forms and terms.

The municipality may by ordinance or resolution fix the date, denominations, maturities, rate or rates of interest, redemption terms, registration privileges, manner of execution, signatures required, purchase price, manner of sale, and other requirements for issuing bonds or notes under this chapter.
If an official whose signature appears on the bonds or coupons ceases to be an official before delivery of the bonds, the signature of the former official is valid as if the former official had remained in office until delivery.

History.

(§ 14 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 29.47.420.
Interest rate.

The interest rate payable on a bond or note issued under this chapter shall be determined by the municipality and is not subject to the usury rate limitations of AS

45.45.010

.

History.

(§ 14 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 29.47.430.
Redemption before maturity.

A bond or note issued under this chapter may be made subject to redemption before maturity as stated in the authorization or in the bond or note.

History.

(§ 14 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 29.47.440.
Borough indebtedness.

A borough may incur indebtedness on

an areawide basis for areawide functions; or

a nonareawide basis for functions performed only in the borough area outside all cities; or

a service area basis for functions performed only in a service area.

Payment of debt principal and interest as well as other costs shall be derived from the area incurring the debt under (a)(2) or (a)(3) of this section, except that the full faith and credit of the entire borough may be pledged to guarantee payment of principal and interest.

If the bonded debt to be incurred by a borough is an areawide debt, the vote is areawide. If the full faith and credit of the entire borough is pledged for the payment of the debt of the borough area outside all cities or of a service area, an areawide election is held and the proposition must pass both areawide and in the area that will benefit from the improvement. If the bonded indebtedness to be incurred is limited to the borough area outside all cities, the vote is limited to voters outside all cities. If the indebtedness to be incurred is limited to a service area, the vote is limited to voters in the service area. Only the full faith and credit of the area voting on the indebtedness is pledged for the payment of the debt.

The indebtedness of a municipality reclassified under AS

29.04.040

—

29.04.060

is not affected by reclassification. All property in a municipality that is reclassified remains subject to taxation to amortize bonded or other indebtedness affecting the municipality and authorized on the effective date of reclassification.

History.

(§ 14 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 29.47.450.
Service area debt.

The indebtedness of a service area acquired under AS

29.47.440

remains the indebtedness of the area that incurred the debt, notwithstanding a subsequent court determination that the service area was not validly formed under law or by virtue of a defect in the proceedings creating the service area.
All property in the service area remains subject to taxation to pay the bonded indebtedness.

History.

(§ 14 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 29.47.460.
Debt for improvement area projects.

A municipality may issue bonds to finance or to make loans to finance the acquisition, construction, rehabilitation, or development of public improvements in improvement areas. The municipality may issue the bonds as general obligation bonds or as revenue bonds or as a combination of revenue bonds, general obligation bonds, and other forms of indebtedness. The municipality may pledge revenues described in (b) of this section, payments to be made by users and owners of the improvements, payments to be made by borrowers of the proceeds of the bonds, and any other revenues available to the municipality to the payment of bonds issued under this subsection. To the extent that the municipality issues general obligation bonds under this subsection, the provisions of AS

29.47.180

—

29.47.200

apply to the bonds. To the extent that the municipality issues revenue bonds under this subsection, the provisions of AS

29.47.250

and

29.47.260

apply to the bonds.

A municipality may provide by ordinance that the tax increment from the taxes levied each year by or on behalf of the municipality on the property in an improvement area shall be used to pay the principal and interest on bonds issued under (a) of this section for improvements in that improvement area, and may irrevocably pledge the tax increment from the area for that purpose. The area described in the ordinance may be a service area. Nothing in this section obligates a municipality that has issued bonds under (a) of this section and pledged a tax increment to the payment of those bonds under this subsection to levy any tax in the improvement area or any other area or to levy a tax at any particular rate within the improvement area or any other area.

The power granted by this section is in addition to other powers granted to municipalities and does not restrict or limit the powers municipalities may have under other provisions of law.

In this section,

“bonds” means bonds, notes, and other forms of indebtedness;

“improvement area” means an area that a municipality determines to be

a blighted area on the basis of the substantial presence of factors such as excessive vacant land on which structures were previously located, abandoned or vacant buildings, substandard structures, and delinquencies in payment of real property taxes; or

an area that is capable of being substantially improved based on the property value within the area;

“tax increment” means the portion of a tax that is attributable to the difference between the value of property within an improvement area shown on the taxing agency’s assessment roll for the year when the taxes are levied and the value of the property shown on the taxing agency’s last assessment roll that was equalized before the improvements in the improvement area were authorized.

History.

(§ 2 ch 118 SLA 1988; am § 1 ch 20 SLA 2001; am § 1 ch 126 SLA 2002)

Sec. 29.47.470.
[Renumbered as AS 29.45.820.]

Sec. 29.47.480.
Accrued actuarial liabilities of retirement systems.

A municipality, or two or more municipalities jointly, may enter into a lease or other contractual agreement with a trustee, or the Alaska Municipal Bond Bank Authority or a subsidiary of the authority, a subsidiary of the Alaska Housing Finance Corporation, the state bond committee, or the Alaska Pension Obligation Bond Corporation in connection with the issuance of obligations by a state entity to prepay all or a portion of each participating municipality’s share of the accrued actuarial liabilities of retirement systems. Obligations issued for purposes described in this subsection must be secured and payable as provided in the agreement or under an authorizing ordinance. The agreement or ordinance may provide for reserves and for protective covenants.

Amounts paid by a participating municipality in connection with obligations issued by a state entity under this section, together with proceeds of the obligations and interest or earnings, may be pooled into one or more funds or accounts, including one or more debt service funds. The assets in any of the funds or accounts may be pledged to the holders of the obligations.

A municipality may enter into a funds diversion agreement with a state agency regarding payment of money on behalf of the municipality that may be applied to payments under a lease, other agreement, or obligation issued under this section. The funds diversion agreement must provide, subject to any conditions set out in the funds diversion agreement, that all or a portion of the funds otherwise payable to the municipality by the state agency shall be paid directly to the trustee, the Alaska Municipal Bond Bank Authority, or its subsidiary, a subsidiary of the Alaska Housing Finance Corporation, the state bond committee, or the Alaska Pension Obligation Bond Corporation, to satisfy, in whole or part, the municipality’s payments under the lease, other agreement, or obligations. Nothing in this subsection or in a funds diversion agreement entered into under this subsection obligates the state or a state agency to pay any amount to or on behalf of a municipality that the municipality is not otherwise entitled to receive or to make any payments of principal or interest on the obligations.

For purposes of this section, “obligations” means bonds, notes, commercial paper, certificates of participation, or other contractual obligations.

History.

(§ 6 ch 35 SLA 2008)

Effective dates. —

Section 20, ch. 35, SLA 2008, makes this section effective May 23, 2008 in accordance with AS

01.10.070(c)

.